Wisconsin, session 2025, SB69.
do enact as follows:SB69,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:SB69,2,6271.05 (6) (b) 57. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, the 3amount of the expenses described under 26 USC 62 (a) (2) (D), not exceeding $300, 4paid during the taxable year by an eligible educator, as defined in 26 USC 62 (d) (1), 5regardless of whether the individual claimed the amount as a deduction under 26 6USC 162 for federal tax purposes.SB69,2,77